Hawaii statutes.
§141-7 General penalty. (a) Any
person violating any of the provisions of chapters 141, 142, or 144 to 149A,
for which violation a penalty is not otherwise provided, or violating any rule
of the department of agriculture, or any master of any vessel which brings into
the State any article which the department at any time shall prohibit from
being imported into the State, or the master of any vessel from which is landed
any article required in chapters 141, 142, or 144 to 149A to be inspected,
before the master has received a permit to land the articles from the
department or its officer or inspector, as provided by chapters 141, 142, and
144 to 149A, shall be fined not more than $500.

(b) When any landowner or land occupier fails
to cooperate with the department in its pest control or eradication programs,
the department may proceed with its program at the expense of the landowner or
land occupier. Any person who violates this chapter or any rule adopted by the
department pursuant to section 141-3 shall be fined not less than $100 nor more
than $500 for the first offense, and not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000
for each offense thereafter. [L 1903, c 44, §16; am L 1905, c 82, §3; am L
1907, c 112, §1; RL 1925, §644; RL 1935, §240; RL 1945, §1031; RL 1955, §18-18;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §141-7; gen ch 1985; am L
1986, c 339, §7; am L 1992, c 72, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next